Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201853-103.38
Spirits, defined.

Spirits means any beverage which contains alcohol obtained
by distillation, mixed with water or other substance in solution. Spirits includes brandy, rum, whiskey, gin, or
other spirituous liquors and such liquors when rectified, blended, or otherwise
mixed with alcohol or other substances. Spirits
does not include flavored malt beverages.

Laws 2010, LB861, § 46;

Laws 2012, LB824, § 5.